Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.240

Application for and effective date of retirement allowances.

Any member or beneficiary eligible to receive a retirement allowance under RCW 41.37.210, 41.37.230, or 41.37.250 shall be eligible to commence receiving a retirement allowance after having filed written application with the department.

(1) Retirement allowances paid to members under RCW 41.37.210 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following the member's separation from employment.

(2) Retirement allowances paid to vested members no longer in service, but qualifying for an allowance pursuant to RCW 41.37.210, shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following the qualification.

(3) Disability allowances paid to disabled members under RCW 41.37.230 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following the member's separation from employment for disability.

(4) Retirement allowances paid as death benefits under RCW 41.37.250 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following the member's death.

[ 2004 c 242 s 30.]